Nebraska, session 109, LB653.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 79-238, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-238 (1)(a) Except as provided in this section and sections 79-235.01
and 79-240, the school board of the option school district shall adopt by
resolution specific capacity standards for acceptance and rejection of
applications.
(b) Capacity for special education services operated by an option school
district shall be determined on a case-by-case basis. If an application for
option enrollment received by a school district indicates that the student has
an individualized education program under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., or has been diagnosed with
a disability as defined in section 79-1118.01, such application shall be
evaluated by the director of special education services of the school district
or the director's designee who shall determine if the school district and the
appropriate class, grade level, or school building in such school district has
the capacity to provide the applicant the appropriate services and
accommodations.
(c) For all other students, standards may include the capacity of a
program, class, grade level, or school building. Capacity shall be determined
by setting a maximum number of option students that a district will accept in
any program, class, grade level, or school building, based upon available
staff, facilities, projected enrollment of resident students, and projected
number of students with which the option school district will contract based on
existing contractual arrangements.
(d) To facilitate option enrollment, school districts shall annually
establish, publish, and report the capacity for each school building under such
district's control pursuant to procedures, criteria, and deadlines established
by the State Board of Education. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
a school board may by resolution, prior to October 15 of each school year,
declare a program, a class, or a school unavailable to option students for the
next school year due to lack of capacity. Standards shall not include previous
academic achievement, athletic or other extracurricular ability, disabilities,
proficiency in the English language, or previous disciplinary proceedings
except as provided in section 79-266.01. False or substantively misleading
information submitted by a parent or guardian on an application to an option
school district may be cause for the option school district to reject a
previously accepted application if the rejection occurs prior to the student's
attendance as an option student.
(2) The school board of every school district shall also adopt specific
standards and conditions for acceptance or rejection of a request for release
of a resident or option student submitting an application to an option school
district after March 15 under subsection (1) of section 79-237. Standards shall
not include that a request occurred after the deadline set forth in this
subsection.
(3) Any option school district that is not a member of a learning
community shall automatically accept applications for give first priority for
enrollment to siblings of option students enrolled in the option school
district without regard to capacity limitations , except that the option school
district shall not be required to accept the sibling of an option student if
the district is at capacity except as provided in subsection (1) of section
79-240.
(4) Any option school district that is in a learning community shall
automatically accept applications for give first priority for enrollment to
siblings of option students enrolled in the option school district without
regard to capacity limitations, then give first second priority for enrollment
to students who have previously been enrolled in the option school district as
an open enrollment student, second third priority for enrollment to students
who reside in the learning community and who contribute to the socioeconomic
diversity of enrollment at the school building to which the student will be
assigned pursuant to section 79-235, and final priority for enrollment to other
students who reside in the learning community. The option school district shall
not be required to accept a student meeting the priority criteria in this
section if the district is at capacity as determined pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section except for siblings of option students or as provided in
-1-

LB653 LB653
2026 2026
section 79-235.01 or 79-240. For purposes of the enrollment option program, a
student who contributes to the socioeconomic diversity of enrollment at a
school building within a learning community means (a) a student who does not
qualify for free or reduced-price lunches when, based upon the certification
pursuant to section 79-2120, the school building the student will be assigned
to attend either has more students qualifying for free or reduced-price lunches
than the average percentage of such students in all school buildings in the
learning community or provides free meals to all students pursuant to the
community eligibility provision or (b) a student who qualifies for free or
reduced-price lunches based on information collected voluntarily from parents
and guardians pursuant to section 79-237 when, based upon the certification
pursuant to section 79-2120, the school building the student will be assigned
to attend has fewer students qualifying for free or reduced-price lunches than
the average percentage of such students in all school buildings in the learning
community and does not provide free meals to all students pursuant to the
community eligibility provision.
Sec. 2. Section 79-265, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-265 (1) Except as provided in section 79-265.01, the principal may deny
any student the right to attend school or to take part in any school function
for a period of up to five school days on the following grounds:
(a) Conduct constituting grounds for expulsion as set out in the Student
Discipline Act; or
(b) Any other violation of rules and standards of behavior adopted under
the act.
(2) Such short-term suspension shall be made only after the principal has
made an investigation of the alleged conduct or violation and has determined
that such suspension is necessary to help any student, to further school
purposes, or to prevent an interference with school purposes.
(3) Before such short-term suspension takes effect, the student and the
parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker as defined in section 79-530 of
the student shall be given oral and written notice of the charges against the
student or written notice of the charges against him or her, an explanation of
the evidence the authorities have, and an opportunity to present the student's
his or her version of the events leading to the alleged conduct or violation
the principal has determined necessitates a short-term suspension and evidence
to support the student's version of such events.
(4)(a) (4) Within twenty-four hours or such additional time as is
reasonably necessary, not to exceed an additional forty-eight hours, following
such suspension, the principal shall send a written statement to the student
and his or her parent or guardian describing:
(i) The the student's conduct, misconduct, or violation of the rule or
standard; and
(ii) The the reasons for the action taken; .
(iii) The actions made by the school to try to discontinue or alleviate
the behavior of the student prior to considering suspension;
(iv) Resources the school is able to provide or recommend to assist the
student; and
(v) How the school plans to handle such behavior in the future, including
an actionable plan aimed at maximizing strategies to keep the student in
school.
(b) The principal shall make a reasonable effort to hold a conference with
the parent or guardian before or at the time the student returns to school and
shall document such effort in writing. If such conference has not been held, a
parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker as defined in section 79-530 may
submit a written request to the school for a conference with the principal
relating to the short-term suspension of such parent's, guardian's, or
educational decisionmaker's child pursuant to this section and the written
statement received pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of this section.
Sec. 3. Section 79-265.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-265.01 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an
elementary school shall not suspend a student in pre-kindergarten through
second grade. Each school district shall develop a policy to implement this
section which shall include disciplinary measures inside the school as an
alternative to suspension.
(2) An elementary school may suspend a student in pre-kindergarten through
second grade if such student:
(a) Brings brings a deadly weapon as defined in section 28-109 onto on
school grounds, into in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school
being used for a school purpose or into in a vehicle being driven for a school
purpose by a school employee or his or her designee, or to at a school-
sponsored activity or athletic event; or .
(b) Engages in violent behavior capable of causing physical harm to
another student or school employee.
Sec. 4. Section 79-268, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-268 If a principal makes a decision to discipline a student by long-
term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment, the following procedures
shall be followed:
(1) The decision as to recommend discipline shall be made within two
school days after learning of the alleged student misconduct. On the date of
the decision, a written charge and a summary of the evidence supporting such
-2-

LB653 LB653
2026 2026
charge shall be filed with the superintendent. The school shall, within two
school days after the decision, send written notice by registered or certified
mail to the student and his or her parent or guardian informing them of the
rights established under the Student Discipline Act;
(2) Such written notice shall include the following:
(a) The rule or standard of conduct allegedly violated and the acts of the
student alleged to constitute a cause for long-term suspension, expulsion, or
mandatory reassignment, including a summary of the evidence to be presented
against the student;
(b) The penalty, if any, which the principal has recommended in the charge
and any other penalty to which the student may be subject;
(c) Resources the school is able to provide or recommend to assist the
student;
(d) How the school plans to handle such behavior in the future, including
an actionable plan aimed at maximizing strategies to keep the student in
school;
(e) (c) A statement that, before long-term suspension, expulsion, or
mandatory reassignment can be invoked, the student has a right to a hearing,
upon request, and that if the student is suspended pending the outcome of the
hearing, the student may complete classwork and homework, including, but not
limited to, examinations, missed during the period of suspension pursuant to
district guidelines which shall not require the student to attend the school
district's alternative programs for expelled students in order to complete
classwork or homework;
(f) (d) A description of the hearing procedures provided by the act, along
with procedures for appealing any decision rendered at the hearing;
(g) (e) A statement that the principal, legal counsel for the school, the
student, the student's parent, or the student's representative or guardian has
the right (i) to examine the student's academic and disciplinary records and
any affidavits to be used at the hearing concerning the alleged misconduct and
(ii) to know the identity of the witnesses to appear at the hearing and the
substance of their testimony; and
(h) (f) A form on which the student, the student's parent, or the
student's guardian may request a hearing, to be signed by such parties and
delivered to the principal or superintendent in person or by registered or
certified mail to the address provided on such form, as prescribed in sections
79-271 and 79-272;
(3) When a notice of intent to discipline a student by long-term
suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment is filed with the
superintendent, the student may be suspended by the principal until the date
the long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment takes effect, if
the principal determines that the student must be suspended immediately to
prevent or substantially reduce the risk of (a) interference with an
educational function or school purpose or (b) a personal injury to the student
himself or herself, other students, school employees, or school volunteers; and
(4) For purposes of this section, mandatory reassignment, regardless of
its implementation date, shall be subject to the procedures of this section.
The Student Discipline Act does not preclude the student or the student's
parent, guardian, or representative from discussing and settling the matter
with appropriate school personnel prior to the time the long-term suspension,
expulsion, or mandatory reassignment takes effect.
Sec. 5. Original sections 79-238, 79-265, 79-265.01, and 79-268, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-